Louisiana, session 2026, HB1077.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 26:271.1(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§271.1. Microbrewery; retail sales on or off premises
A.(1) Any person who has properly obtained a microbrewer's permit as
provided for in R.S. 26:271 shall be authorized to engage in the brewing of beer and
other malt beverages in a quantity not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred
barrels during the licensed year. The holder of such permit shall also be authorized
to sell the manufactured beverages at retail for consumption on or off the licensed
premises, if the holder also has been issued a Retailer, Class A permit. Additionally,
the holder of a microbrewer's permit and a Class A permit shall be authorized to sell
the manufactured beverages at special events through not more than twelve permits
issued in accordance with LAC Title 55, Part VII, Subpart 1 §323(B), if such permit
is issued in the same name as the microbrewer's permit.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.